Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 20

Tennessee Voter Confidence Act

2-20-101. Utilization of precinct-based optical scanners.

A county election commission may utilize precinct-based optical scanners.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Precinct-based optical scanner” means an optical ballot scanner that is located in the precinct and into which optical scan voter-verified paper ballots, marked either by hand by the voter or with the assistance of a device, are inserted to count the voter verified paper ballot;

“Top race” means the presidential race, if the presidential race is on the ballot, or the governor's race, if the governor's race is on the ballot; and

“Voter-verified paper ballot” means a permanent, individual paper ballot that is marked either manually by the voter or with the assistance of a device and verified by the voter as correctly reflecting the voter's intent, before the voter's vote is counted by the precinct-based optical scanner.

It is the intent of the general assembly that any county election commission utilizing a precinct-based optical scanner pursuant to this chapter shall comply in all respects with this chapter and federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 3; 2010, ch. 612, §§ 2, 3; 2011, ch. 301, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 301, § 7 provided that nothing in the act, which rewrote this section, shall be construed as restricting or otherwise prohibiting the utilization of precinct-based optical scanners approved for use pursuant to title 2, chapter 9, and in use by a county election commission on May 27, 2011, or the replacement of such voting machines through lease or purchase with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

2-20-102. Voter with disabilities — Privacy of ballot.

All voting systems shall meet the minimum federal law requirements with regard to enabling voters with disabilities to complete the voting process in a manner that maintains the privacy of the voter's ballot.

Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

2-20-103. Automatic mandatory audits of voter-verified paper ballots — Random selection of precincts — Security of ballots — Certification of results.

Following each November general election any county election commission utilizing a precinct-based optical scanner shall, in accordance with this section, conduct automatic mandatory audits of the voter-verified paper ballots cast for the president of the United States in a presidential election and the governor in a gubernatorial election, hereafter referred to as the “top race.” The county election commission shall prepare to conduct the audit in the following manner:

Prior to each election, the county election commission shall first assure that each optical scan tabulator used to count absentee by-mail ballots, early voting ballots and election day ballots have been cleaned of debris by the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall provide the election commission with a certificate that attests to the cleaning of the tabulator prior to the election. The certificate of any optical scan tabulator used during the automatic audit shall be made available to the public prior to the use of the optical scan tabulator in the audit process;

The county election commission shall randomly select at least one (1) precinct-based optical scan tabulator used to count ballots cast during early voting;

For counties having a population of less than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county election commission shall randomly select at least one (1) voting precinct in the county;

For counties having a population of three hundred thousand (300,000) or greater, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county election commission shall randomly select at least five (5) voting precincts in the county; and

Before an optical scan tabulator may be used for the audit process, a printed tape of the election results must be generated and the electronic election results from the tabulator must be backed up onto a separate laptop. The optical scan tabulator must be cleared and reset. A zero tape from the optical scan tabulator must be printed before the tabulator may be used in the audit process.

Immediately after the polls close and at a place open to the public, the county election commission shall randomly select the voting precinct or precincts, as appropriate, and shall select at least one (1) precinct-based optical scan tabulator used to count ballots during early voting to be used for the automatic mandatory audit and shall announce to the public the results of the random drawing. The random selection utilized by the county election commission shall ensure that all voting precincts in the county and all precinct-based optical scan tabulators used to count ballots cast during early voting have an equal chance of being selected.

After the unofficial election results, excluding provisional ballots, have been determined and made public, a county election commissioner from the majority party and a county election commissioner from the minority party shall have all absentee by-mail ballots, all ballots cast during the early voting period and all ballots cast on election day locked and sealed pursuant to § 2-6-311 until the county election commission convenes to conduct the audit. The county election commission shall also lock and secure each precinct-based optical scan tabulator used in the election process until the county election commission convenes to conduct the audit.

Before one o'clock p.m. (1:00 p.m.) local time on the day following election day the automatic audit shall be conducted in the following manner:

At a time and place open to the public, the county election commission shall identify those ballot boxes containing the absentee by-mail ballots cast in the randomly selected voting precinct or precincts and identify those ballot boxes containing the election day ballots cast in the randomly selected voting precinct or precincts. The election commission must include in the audit only those absentee by-mail ballots which were counted by an optical scan tabulator rather than by hand. A county election commissioner from the majority party and a county election commissioner from the minority party, personally holding the keys to such ballot box or boxes, shall unlock the ballot box or boxes;

The election commission shall identify and remove from the respective ballot box or boxes each ballot cast in the absentee by-mail voting process in the selected precincts which were counted by an optical scan tabulator and each ballot cast on election day in the selected precinct or precincts;

In auditing the precinct-based optical scan tabulator which had been used to originally count the early voting voter-verified paper ballots, the county election commission shall remove the early voting ballots contained in the ballot box of the optical scan tabulator and shall verify the accuracy of the unofficial election results by inserting such early voting ballots into the randomly selected optical scan tabulator. The county election commission shall compare the results of the top race obtained during the automatic audit of such optical scan tabulator with the unofficial election results of the top race. The election commission shall publicly announce the results;

In auditing the absentee by-mail ballots which were counted by an optical scan tabulator, the county election commission shall take the absentee by-mail ballots from the randomly selected voting precinct or precincts and shall verify the accuracy of the unofficial election results by inserting the subject absentee by-mail in a different precinct-based optical scan tabulator than that used to originally count the absentee ballots;

In auditing the election day ballots, the county election commission shall take the election day ballots from the randomly selected voting precinct or precincts and shall verify the accuracy of the unofficial election results by inserting the subject election day ballots in a different precinct-based optical scan tabulator than that used to originally count the election day ballots;

To judge the accuracy of the unofficial election results, the county election commission shall compare the results of the top race obtained during the automatic audit with the unofficial election results of the top race obtained on election night. The election commission shall publicly announce the results;

If as a result of the automatic audit the county election commission finds that there is a variance of less than one percent (1%) between the unofficial election results of the top race and the automatic audit, no hand count audit shall be required and the county election commission shall certify the election results as originally determined;

If as a result of the automatic audit, the county election commission finds that there is a variance of more than one percent (1%) between the unofficial election results of the top race and the automatic audit, the county election commission shall randomly select at least three percent (3%) of the voting precincts in the county. The county election commission may include the voting precincts previously audited. The county election commission must identify the ballot box or boxes from the subject voting precincts, obtain the ballots out of those ballot boxes and then insert such ballots into a different optical scan tabulator than that used to originally count the ballots. In addition, the county election commission may conduct a manual hand count of the same ballots subjected to the automatic audit described in this subdivision (b)(2)(D)(ii). The automatic audit or the manual hand count audit, if one is conducted, shall be of the top race on the ballot in such voting precincts used in the expanded audit. The county election commission shall publicly announce the results of the automatic audit and the manual hand count if a manual hand count is conducted;

The results of any difference between precinct-based optical scan tabulations or the hand count audit shall be available for use in any election contest filed pursuant to chapter 17 of this title.

Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 3; 2010, ch. 612, § 7; 2011, ch. 301, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 301, § 7 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subdivision (a)(1), shall be construed as restricting or otherwise prohibiting the utilization of precinct-based optical scanners approved for use pursuant to title 2, chapter 9, and in use by a county election commission on May 27, 2011, or the replacement of such voting machines through lease or purchase with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

2-20-104. Electronic voting systems — Rules and regulations — Testing of equipment.

All new precinct-based optical scanners purchased or leased pursuant to this chapter:

Shall be certified pursuant to § 2-9-110 and shall have been certified by the election assistance commission as having met the applicable voluntary voting systems guidelines. In addition, the precinct-based optical scanners shall be tested to ensure the scanners operate in accordance with the guidelines; and

Shall, with all relevant documentation, be made available by their vendors, at the request of the state election commission or the secretary of state for review by an independent expert, selected by the state election commission or the secretary of state, to ensure the functionality and security of its systems.

The state coordinator of elections shall enact necessary rules and regulations to require that all required tests are properly conducted on the precinct-based optical scanners as well as requiring a sufficient review be conducted of the precinct-based optical scanners and the relevant documentation to ensure compliance with this subsection (a).

Prior to each election, all precinct-based optical scanners purchased, leased or used by any county election commission pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to acceptance testing by the commission in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state coordinator of elections.

With respect to precinct-based optical scanners purchased or leased pursuant to this chapter, vendors shall provide access to all information required by law, rule or regulation, which shall be placed in escrow with an agent designated by the secretary of state.

No precinct-based optical scanners used in an election in this state shall have any capability, enabled or disabled, for wireless communication of any sort.

Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 3; 2010, ch. 612, § 4; 2011, ch. 301, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 301, § 7 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed as restricting or otherwise prohibiting the utilization of precinct-based optical scanners approved for use pursuant to title 2, chapter 9, and in use by a county election commission on May 27, 2011 or the replacement of such voting machines through lease or purchase with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

2-20-105. Duties and powers of coordinator of elections.

At the request of a county election commission, the state coordinator of elections shall provide to the commission necessary assistance and guidance in the selection of a precinct-based optical scanner pursuant to the requirements of this chapter. To the extent federal funding through the Help America Vote Act (HAVA), compiled generally in 42 U.S.C. §§ 15301 et seq., remains available for the cost of purchasing or leasing any new precinct-based optical scanners, the coordinator shall provide financial assistance for purchasing or leasing such machines.

The coordinator of elections shall provide a list of authorized printers for any county election commission to utilize for the printing of ballots required pursuant to this chapter.

The coordinator of elections is authorized to explore the feasibility of utilizing ballot-on-demand technology.

Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 3; 2011, ch. 301, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 301, § 7 provided that nothing in the act, which added subsection (a) and amended subdivision (b)(1), shall be construed as restricting or otherwise prohibiting the utilization of precinct-based optical scanners approved for use pursuant to title 2, chapter 9, and in use by a county election commission on May 27, 2011, or the replacement of such voting machines through lease or purchase with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

2-20-106. Voting system preference.

Every effort shall be made to purchase United States manufactured precinct-based optical scanner voting systems.

Acts 2010, ch. 612, § 5.